Georgia, session 2025_26, HB869.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating and establishing a joint airport authority for the City of Cartersville and
Bartow County, Georgia, approved February 28, 1966 (Ga. L. 1966, p. 2270), is amended
by revising Section 2 as follows:
"Section 2. Such authority shall be composed of three members, one of whom shall be
appointed by the board of aldermen of the City of Cartersville in the same manner as in the
appointment of the chief of police, and one member shall be appointed by the
commissioner of roads and revenues for Bartow County, Georgia. One member shall be
appointed by the local delegation consisting of all members of the General Assembly
H. B. 869
- 1 -

LC 62 0082/AP
whose districts are wholly or partially within Bartow County. The authority so constituted
shall annually elect its chairperson from its number."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 869
- 2 -